Wisconsin, session 2025, AB144.
do enact as follows:AB144,14Section 1. 752.03 of the statutes is amended to read:AB144,2,45752.03 Number of judges. There shall be 16 court of appeals judges. Three 1Beginning August 1, 2026, 4 judges shall be elected from the district specified in s. 2752.17, 4 judges shall be elected from each of the 2 4 districts specified in ss. 752.13 3and, 752.15 and 5 judges shall be elected from the district specified in s., 752.17, 4and 752.19.AB144,25Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB144,2,86(1) District IV judgeship. The judgeship for the district IV court of appeals 7for the judge whose current term ends July 31, 2026, shall be eliminated effective 8with the expiration of the term for that position on July 31, 2026.AB144,2,119(2) Election of district III judge. The initial election for the 4th judge for 10district III of the court of appeals shall be at the spring election of 2026 for a term 11beginning on August 1, 2026, and ending on July 31, 2032.AB144,2,1212